Arkansas, session 2025, SB383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-5-1408 is repealed.
15-5-1408. Annual report.
The designated investor group shall publish an annual report within six
(6) months after the close of its fiscal year, which shall:
(1) Include its annual audit of the activities conducted by the
designated investor group;
(2) Be presented in writing, and by testimony if requested, to
the:
(A) Governor;
(B) House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development; and
(C) Arkansas Development Finance Authority;
(3) Document and review the progress of the designated investor
group in implementing its investment plan; and
(4) List any use, redemption, or transfer of tax credits allowed
*JLL212*
03/05/2025 9:59:20 AM JLL212

SB383
under this subchapter.



































03/05/2025 9:59:20 AM JLL212